District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.42

Exceptions regarding sex discrimination and age.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter regarding sex discrimination in admission policy shall apply to any private undergraduate college or to any private preschool, elementary or secondary school; except that, when any of the above exempted colleges offers a course nowhere else available in the District, opportunity for admission to that course must be open to students of both sexes who otherwise meet lawful requirements for admission.

(b)

It shall not be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the District of Columbia to prescribe minimum and maximum age limits for appointment to the police officer and firefighter cadet programs.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 242, 24 DCR 6038
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 4(b), 29 DCR 5745

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2521.
1973 Ed., § 6-2252.

Prior Codifications